Illinois, session 104th, HB3120.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 13or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 14exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 15obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 16regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 21otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 22regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 23relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply   HB3120- 2 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1with other applicable rules or regulations.2    (c) (Blank). 3    (d) (Blank).4    (e) (Blank). 5    (f) As used in this Section:6    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 7output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 8Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 9Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 10    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 11sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 12calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 13greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 14by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 15CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 16them all together.17    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 18system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 19electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 20source.21    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 22have been identified by the United States Environmental 23Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.24    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 25fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 26cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate   HB3120- 3 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 2sale.3    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 4that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 5and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 6program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.7    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 8community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 9would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 10designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 11economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 12following areas:13        (1) areas where residents have been historically 14    excluded from economic opportunities, including 15    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 16    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 17    Tax Act; and18        (2) areas where residents have been historically 19    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 20    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 21    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 22    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 23    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.24    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 25means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 26investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and   HB3120- 4 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 2person means the following people:3        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community;5        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 6    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 7    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 8    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 9    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 10    the last 5 years;11        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 12    in the foster care system; or13        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.14    "Existing emissions" means: 15        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 16    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 17    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 18    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 19    that unit's operation; and20        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 21    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 22    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 23    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 24    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 25    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 26an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic   HB3120- 5 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 2copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 3electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 4energy source.5    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 6GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 7unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 8nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 9capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 10including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 11oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.12    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 13emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 14Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 15Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 16recent year for which data is available.17    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 18GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 19including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 20by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 21municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 22other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 23and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.24    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 25output emission rate" as measured by the United States 26Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation   HB3120- 6 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 2most recent year for which data is available.3    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 4use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 5shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 6zero no later than January 1, 2030.7    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 8use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 9permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 10December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 11also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 12emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 13reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 14the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 15its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 162038.17    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 18use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 19permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 20including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 21hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 22proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 23following:24        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 25    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 26    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of   HB3120- 7 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 2    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 3    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 4    community.5        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 6    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 7    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 8    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 9    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 10    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 11    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 12    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 13    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 14    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 15    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 16    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 17    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 18    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.19        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 20    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 21    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 22    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 23    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 24    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 25    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 26    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible   HB3120- 8 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 2    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 3    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 4    2030.5        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 6    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 7    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 8    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 9    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 10    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.11        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 12    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 13    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 14use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 15permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 16including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 17hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 18proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.19    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 20utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 21shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 22zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 23green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 24commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 25January 1, 2045.26    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that   HB3120- 9 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 2emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 3that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 4    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 5GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 6emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 7specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 8been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 9this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 10necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 11ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 12EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 13operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 14reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 15GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:16        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 17    participant in a regional transmission organization 18    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 19    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 20    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 21    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 22    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;23        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 24    participant in a regional transmission organization 25    receives notice that the regional transmission 26    organization has determined that continued operation of   HB3120- 10 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 2    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 3    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 4    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 5    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 6    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 7    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 8    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 9    identified by the regional transmission organization is 10    resolved; and11        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 12    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 13    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 14    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 15    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 16    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 17    Illinois Commerce Commission.18    (l-5) The owner or operator of any large GHG-emitting unit 19in the State, including the owner or operator of an EGU in the 20State, may petition the Illinois Commerce Commission under 21this subsection for a waiver of any one or more of the emission 22limitations set forth in subsections (g) through (k-5) of this 23Section. Within 30 days after receiving such a petition, the 24Commission shall hold at least one public hearing on the 25petition at a location that is within 50 miles of at least one 26of the units for which the waiver is sought. If the Commission   HB3120- 11 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1determines, following such a hearing, that compliance with any 2one or more of the emission limitations set forth in 3subsections (g) through (k-5) of this Section will either 4threaten the reliability or adequacy of electricity supplies 5in the State or will create a significant economic hardship 6for electricity users in the State, then the Commission may 7enter a written order waiving the operation of any one or more 8of those limitations for any large GHG-emitting units in the 9State for a period to be specified by the Commission in its 10order. If there is a conflict between the terms of this Section 11and an order entered by the Commission under this subsection, 12the Commission's order shall control. 13    (l-10) If at any time the Illinois Commerce Commission 14believes that an impending plant closure would threaten the 15reliability or adequacy of electricity supplies in the State 16or create a significant economic hardship for electricity 17users, the Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter a written 18order waiving the operation of any one or more of the emission 19limitations set forth in subsections (g) through (k-5) for any 20large GHG-emitting units in the State for a period to be 21specified by the Commission. If there is a conflict between 22the terms of this Section and an order entered by the 23Commission under this subsection, the Commission's order shall 24control. 25    (m) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, no No 26variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory relief   HB3120- 12 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 2emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 3Section.4    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 5shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 6forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 7units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 8the prior year.9    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 10Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 11Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 12publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 13State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 14development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 15emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 16developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 17current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 18reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 19years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 20Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 21Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 22Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 23Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 24regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 25anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 26development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting   HB3120- 13 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 2The report shall be released publicly by no later than 3December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 4Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 5Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 6data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 7energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 8and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 9the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 10subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 11adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 12sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 13MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 14regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 15transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 16will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 17the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 18Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 19or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 20requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 21to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 22State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 23deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 24reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 25with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 26appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable   HB3120- 14 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 2development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 3resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.4        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 5    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 6    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 7    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 8    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 9    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 10    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 11    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 12    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 13    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 14    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 15    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 16    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 17    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 18    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 19    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 20    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 21    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 22    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 23    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 24    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 25    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 26    as necessary based on the comments received and file its   HB3120- 15 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 2    approval.3        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 4    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 5    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 6    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 7    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 8    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 9    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 10    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 11    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 12    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 13    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 14    mitigation plan within 180 days.15        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 16    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 17    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 18    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 19    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 20    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 21    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 22    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 23    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 24    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 25    increases in emissions.26        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency   HB3120- 16 -LRB104 10072 BDA 20144 b1    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 2    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 3    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 4    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 5    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 6(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.